Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-857
Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

All money received pursuant to the Commercial Feed Act shall be remitted by the director to the State Treasurer for credit to the Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund which is hereby created. Such fund shall be used by the department to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the act, any other animal health programs administered by the department, and a cooperative agreement with the United States Department of Agriculture Market News reporting program. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Commercial Feed Administration Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 57;

Laws 2008, LB961, § 3;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB305, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 83;

Laws 2014, LB941, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB2, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 146.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.